Massachusetts, session 194th, S1425.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 133 of the acts of 2022 is hereby amended by striking out section 3 
and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 3. As consideration for the change in the conservation restriction authorized in 
section 1, the town of Hanson shall, pursuant to section 3 of chapter 40 of the General Laws, 
transfer the care, custody and control of a certain 25.405, more or less, acre parcel identified as 
the town of Hanson assessors’ map 49, parcel 1-1A and a 3,922, more or less, square foot parcel 
identified as assessors’ map 105, parcel 6 from the board of selectmen to the conservation 
commission for the purpose of wildlife, recreation and forestry. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.